District of Columbia statutes.
34-1257.01

Jurisdictional parity.

A cable system authorized by this chapter shall have no less than the channel capacity, products, and services available from a system serving any similarly sized, or smaller, jurisdiction outside of the District, or a system owned and operated by the cable operator, its parents, affiliates, or subsidiaries outside of the District, except as otherwise set forth in a franchise agreement. In no event shall such system have a bandwidth of less than 750 MHZ. Nothing herein shall be construed to require a cable operator to employ any specific transmission technology.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 701
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334

History